District of Columbia statutes.
Renumbered

22-1015

Penalty for engaging in animal fighting

Renumbered as § 22-1006.01.

History

June 25, 1892, 27 Stat. 61, ch. 135, § 6a
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-303, § 3(a), 47 DCR 7307
Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 109, 55 DCR 9186